Hawaii statutes.
[§321-30.2] Civil monetary
penalty special fund. (a) There is established the civil monetary penalty
special fund, to be administered by the department of health. The fund shall
consist of moneys collected by the United States Department of Health and Human
Services Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as federally imposed civil
monetary penalty funds when health care facilities or agencies do not meet
medicare certification requirements as determined by the department of health
when it conducts medicare certification surveys and complaint investigations on
health care facilities or agencies in Hawaii in accordance with section 1864 of
the Social Security Act. Moneys in the fund shall be expended by the
department of health as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services. Not more than $30,000 of the moneys in the fund may be used during
any fiscal year for the activities carried out by the department of health as
approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(b) Pursuant to federal law, civil monetary
penalty special fund moneys shall not be subject to deposit into the general
fund for any reason.

(c) The department of health shall submit a
report to the legislature concerning the status of the civil monetary penalty
special fund, including the amount of moneys deposited into and expended from
the civil monetary penalty special fund, and the sources of receipts and uses
of expenditures, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session. [L 2015, c 71, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next